Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 2
JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE

2-3-201. Joint budget committee established.

There is hereby established a joint committee of the senate and house of representatives officially known as the joint budget committee, and to consist of the chairman of the house appropriations committee plus one majority party member and one minority party member thereof, and the chairman of the senate appropriations committee plus one majority party member and one minority party member thereof. Members of the committee shall be chosen in each house in the same manner as members of other standing committees are chosen. The committee shall function during the legislative sessions and during the interim between sessions.

In order to expedite the work of the committee, appointees may be designated by the respective majority and minority parties prior to the convening of the general assembly at which such committee is to serve, whether such appointees are members of the then current general assembly or members-elect of the next general assembly, or both; and such appointees have all the powers and duties and are entitled to the same compensation and expense allowance as members duly appointed under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

The committee shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman, one from the senate membership of the committee and one from the house membership of the committee. The chairman so elected shall serve as chairman for the first regular session of the general assembly at which the committee is to serve, and as vice-chairman for the second regular session; the vice-chairman so elected shall serve as chairman for the second regular session of said general assembly.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 464, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-17.

L. 65:

p. 685, § 4.

L. 67:

p. 541, § 1.

L. 69:

p. 462, § 1.

Cross references:

For compensation and expenses for committee members, see § 2-2-307 (3).

2-3-202. Organization and meetings.

The committee may prescribe its own rules of procedure and may appoint subcommittees from the membership of the general assembly, and shall meet as often as is necessary to perform its functions.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 464, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-18.

2-3-203. Powers and duties of the joint budget committee.

The committee has the following power and duties:

To study the management, operations, programs, and fiscal needs of the agencies and institutions of Colorado state government;

Repealed.

(b.1) (I) (A) Effective July 1, 2004, to hold hearings as required and to review the executive budget and the budget requests of each state agency and institution, including capital construction, capital renewal, or controlled maintenance budget requests as prioritized, pursuant to rule 45 of the joint rules of the senate and house of representatives, by the capital development committee, and information technology budget requests as prioritized, pursuant to rule 45 of the joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives, by the joint technology committee, and to make appropriation recommendations to the appropriations committees, or any successor committees, of each house.

If the joint budget committee's recommendations to the appropriations committees in the general appropriations bill alter the determinations of priority established by the capital development committee, prior to making the recommendations, the joint budget committee shall notify the capital development committee and allow for a joint meeting of the two committees.

If the joint budget committee's recommendations to the appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives in the annual general appropriation bill alter the determinations of priority established by the joint technology committee, prior to making the recommendations, the joint budget committee shall notify the joint technology committee and allow for a joint meeting of the two committees.

Repealed.

Effective July 1, 2013, to hold hearings as required to review the performance plans and performance evaluations of departments as specified in section 2-7-204 (6). Based on its review of these performance plans and performance evaluations and its consideration of each department's legal responsibilities and strategic goals and objectives, the joint budget committee may prioritize departments' requests for new funding that are expressly intended to enhance productivity, improve efficiency, reduce costs, and eliminate waste in the processes and operations that deliver goods and services to taxpayers and customers of state government.

To make estimates of revenue from existing and proposed taxes and to make its staff facilities available, upon request, to the finance committee of either house for the development and analysis of proposed revenue measures;

To study and from time to time review the state's fund structure, financial condition, fiscal organization, and its budgeting, accounting, reporting, personnel, and purchasing procedures;

Repealed.

If a principal department of the executive branch of state government as specified in section 24-1-110, C.R.S., submits a plan approved by the office of state planning and budgeting to improve budgetary efficiency or administrative flexibility by recommending line item consolidation in the annual general appropriation act, the committee shall consider such plan for recommendation to the general assembly.

After passage of the annual general appropriation act, in preparing any letter to the governor with requests for information, the committee shall prioritize such requests in the letter.

The joint budget committee shall consider, as one of many factors, any available evidence-based information specified in section 2-3-210 when determining the appropriate level of funding of a program or practice.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 465, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-19.

L. 69:

p. 462, § 2.

L. 85:

(1)(b) amended and (1)(b.1) added, p. 285, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 89:

(1)(b)(II) and (1)(b.1) amended, p. 336, § 4, effective March 15.

L. 94:

(1)(b.1) amended, p. 628, § 2, effective April 14; (1)(e) added, p. 1094, § 3, effective May 9; (1)(f) added, p. 1836, § 2, effective June 1; (1)(e) amended, p. 2614, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1275, § 10, effective June 5.

L. 98:

(1)(b.1) amended, p. 816, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2000:

(1)(f) repealed, p. 22, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2001:

(1)(e) repealed, p. 309, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(1)(b.1)(I) amended, p. 231, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

(1)(b.1)(I)(B) amended, (HB 09-1169), ch. 45, p. 168, § 2, effective March 20.

L. 2010:

(2) and (3) added, (HB 10-1119), ch. 340, p. 1564, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(1)(b.2) added, (HB 13-1299), ch. 382, p. 2242, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(b.1)(I)(A) amended and (1)(b.1)(I)(C) added, (HB 14-1395), ch. 309, pp. 1306, 1309, §§ 3, 8, effective May 31; (1)(b.1)(I) and (1)(b.1)(I)(A) amended, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, pp. 1822, 1854, §§ 21, 68, effective June 6; (1)(g) added, (SB 14-110), ch. 105, p. 390, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2019:

(1)(b.1)(I)(C) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3462, § 1, effective August 2; (1)(g) repealed, (HB 19-1214), ch. 349, p. 3238, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(4) added, (SB 21-284), ch. 445, p. 2939, § 2, effective September 7.

2-3-204. Staff director, assistants, and consultants.

The committee shall interview persons applying for the position of staff director as to qualifications and ability and shall make recommendations thereon to the executive committee, which shall appoint the staff director as provided in section 2-3-303 (3). The staff director shall be responsible to the committee for the collection and assembling of all data and the preparation of reports and recommendations. The staff director shall also be responsible for preparing for consideration by the committee analyses of all requests for funds. With the approval of the committee, the staff director may appoint such additional professional, technical, clerical, or other employees necessary to perform the functions assigned to the committee. The staff director and such additional personnel shall be appointed without reference to affiliation and solely on the basis of ability to perform the duties of the position. They shall be employees of the general assembly and shall not be subject to the state personnel system laws. The committee shall establish appropriate qualifications and compensation for all positions. With the consent of the committee, the chairperson may contract for professional services by private consultants as needed.

Repealed.

The staff director shall appoint additional staff as necessary to provide the evidence-based analysis required by section 2-3-210 (3)(c). Upon request, joint budget committee staff shall also assist legislators in incorporating evidence-based assessments into legislation.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 465, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-20.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 306, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2107, § 8, effective June 9.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1624, § 11, effective May 31.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1155, § 3, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 163, § 20, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(2) repealed, p. 585, § 10, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(3) added, (SB 21-284), ch. 445, p. 2939, § 3, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2965, § 8, effective August 10.

2-3-205. Expenses - vouchers.

All expenses incurred by the committee, including salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon vouchers signed by the chairman, or, in his absence or unavailability, the vice-chairman, or by the staff director upon instruction by the chairman in each instance, and drawn on funds appropriated generally for legislative expenses and allocated to the committee.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 465, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-21.

L. 69:

p. 462, § 3.

L. 73:

p. 670, § 2.

2-3-206. Recommendations and findings.

The committee may issue a written report setting forth its recommendations, findings, and comments as to each appropriation recommendation which it submits to the house and senate appropriations committees. Other reports may be issued from time to time by the committee as it deems appropriate or as requested by the general assembly.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 465, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 63-2-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-22.

L. 69:

p. 462, § 4.

2-3-207. Implementation of a zero-base budgeting program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 257, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 79:

(2), (3)(b), (3)(d), and (3)(g) amended and (3)(b.5) added, p. 297, § 1, effective July 3.

L. 83:

(5) amended, p. 969, § 18, effective July 1, 1984.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (HB 10-1119), ch. 340, p. 1575, § 12, effective August 11.

Cross references:

In 2010, this section was repealed by the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 340, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

2-3-208. Budget requests - amendments - supplemental appropriation requests - deadlines - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Budget request amendment" means any change to a budget request for the upcoming state fiscal year that a state agency submits to the joint budget committee.

"State agency" means any department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, institution of higher education, agency, or other governmental unit of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government that receives an appropriation or is otherwise included in the annual general appropriation act.

A state agency shall submit its budget request for the upcoming state fiscal year to the joint budget committee by November 1. Except as set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the state agency shall submit any budget request amendments to the joint budget committee by January 15.

A state agency shall submit a budget request amendment that is related to a request for a supplemental appropriation to the joint budget committee by January 2; except that the January 2 deadline does not apply to a budget request amendment that is related to a request for a supplemental appropriation identified in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section.

A state agency may submit a budget request amendment to the joint budget committee after its applicable deadline if the budget request amendment is based upon circumstances unknown to, and not reasonably foreseeable by, the state agency prior to the deadline.

Any deadline in this subsection (2) is the date immediately preceding the state fiscal year that is the subject of the budget request or budget request amendment.

Except as set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), a state agency shall submit a request for a supplemental appropriation for the current state fiscal year to the joint budget committee by January 2.

The department of education shall submit a request for a supplemental appropriation pursuant to section 22-54-106 (4)(b) to the joint budget committee by January 15. The department of corrections and the division of youth services in the department of human services shall each submit a request for a supplemental appropriation related to changes in caseload to the joint budget committee by January 15.

A state agency may submit a request for a supplemental appropriation to the joint budget committee after its applicable deadline if the supplemental appropriation is based upon circumstances unknown to, and not reasonably foreseeable by, the state agency prior to the deadline.

Any deadline in this subsection (3) is the date during the state fiscal year that the request for a supplemental appropriation is made.

The office of state planning and budgeting may submit a request identified in this section to the joint budget committee on behalf of a state agency, and in such case, the corresponding deadline for the request applies to the office.

A state agency or the office of state planning and budgeting acting on behalf of a state agency shall meet the deadlines and requirements set forth in section 24-37-304 (1)(c.3) and (1)(c.5) for a capital construction, capital renewal, controlled maintenance, or information technology budget request or budget request amendment, including a budget request amendment that is related to a request for a supplemental appropriation, prior to the submission of any such budget request to the joint budget committee pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1179), ch. 123, p. 415, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(3)(b)(I) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1968, § 12, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(5) added, (HB 18-1371), ch. 312, p. 1875, § 2, effective August 8.

2-3-209. Long-range financial plan - definitions.

As used in this section, "state agency" means a state agency that submits a budget request to the joint budget committee in accordance with section 2-3-208, whether the request is submitted directly by the state agency or by the office of state planning and budgeting on behalf of the state agency.

Each state agency shall develop a long-range financial plan on or before November 1, 2019, and update the plan on or before November 1 of each of the next four years thereafter. The purpose of the long-range financial plan is to:

Require the state agency to anticipate and strategically plan for future contingencies that may impact the state agency's ability to meet its performance goals;

Assist the state agency as it prepares its annual budget request;

Provide additional information to the general assembly so that it can appropriate money in light of possible future changes; and

Provide notice to the public about the potential growth or decline of state government in the future.

The department of state, the department of treasury, the department of law, and the judicial branch shall each publish the required components of the long-range financial plan for their respective state agencies. The office of state planning and budgeting shall publish the required components of the long-range financial plan in its annual budget instructions for all other state agencies. A long-range financial plan submitted pursuant to this subsection (3) may include the following components:

A statement of the state agency's mission;

A description of the major functions of the state agency;

A description of the state agency's performance goals;

A performance evaluation of the state agency's major programs, including an identification of programs that may not be meeting the program objectives or performance goals, and a recommendation on strategies to improve performance;

A description of anticipated trends, conditions, or events that could impact the ability of the state agency to meet its goals and objectives; and

A description of any programs currently funded in whole or in part with federal funds or gifts, grants, or donations that the department anticipates will decrease in the future and, therefore, may require state money as a backfill.

Each state agency shall submit a copy of its long-range financial plan to the joint budget committee along with its budget request that is submitted in accordance with section 2-3-208; except that, if the office of state planning and budgeting submits a budget request on behalf of a state agency, the office may also submit the state agency's long-range financial plan.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the requirement to update and submit the long-range financial plan continues as set forth in subsection (2) of this section. A long-range financial plan remains in effect until it is updated for the next state fiscal year. To the extent possible, the state agency shall utilize information that is included in the state agency's annual performance report prepared in accordance with section 2-7-205.

Each state agency shall post its long-range financial plans on its official website at the same time it is submitted to the joint budget committee.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1430), ch. 356, p. 2117, § 2, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1430, see section 1 of chapter 356, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

2-3-210. Evidence-based decision-making - budget requests - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

When appropriate, the use of data and outcome-related evidence in the analysis of programs implemented and delivered by state agencies is an effective means through which funding decisions concerning program improvement and expansion or redirection of funds can be achieved; and

The integration of evidence-based evaluation with the budget process will provide members of the general assembly additional information that will be useful in the prioritization of requests for funding for new or existing programs and services in the state.

As used in this article 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Evidence-informed program or practice" means a program or practice that reflects a moderate, supported, or promising level of confidence of effectiveness, ineffectiveness, or harmfulness as determined by an evaluation with a comparison group, multiple pre- and post-evaluations, or an equivalent measure.

"Not applicable" means the definitions identified in subsections (2)(a), (2)(c), (2)(d), and (2)(f) of this section are not applicable.

"Opinion-based program or practice" means a program or practice that reflects a low level of confidence of effectiveness, ineffectiveness, or harmfulness, as based on satisfaction surveys, personal experience, or for which there is no existing evidence about the effectiveness, ineffectiveness, or harmfulness of the program or practice.

"Proven program or practice" means a program or practice that reflects a high or well-supported level of confidence of effectiveness, ineffectiveness, or harmfulness as determined by one or more high-quality randomized control trials, multiple evaluations with strong comparison groups, or an equivalent measure.

"State agency" means any department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, institution of higher education, agency, or other governmental unit of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government.

"Theory-informed program or practice" means a program or practice that reflects a moderate to low or promising level of confidence of effectiveness, ineffectiveness, or harmfulness as determined by tracking and evaluating performance measures including pre- and post-intervention evaluation of program outcomes, evaluation of program outputs, identification and implementation of a theory of change, or equivalent measures.

If a state agency or the office of state planning and budgeting includes an evidence-based evaluation of a program or practice in a budget request or budget amendment request submitted in accordance with section 2-3-208, then the state agency or office shall describe the program or practice using the definitions set forth in this section.

If subsection (3)(a) of this section applies, then the state agency or the office of state planning and budgeting shall also provide the following information:

Any research that supports the implementation, continuation, or expansion of the program or practice, including any research demonstrating improved or consistent outcomes achieved by those who benefit from the program or practice;

Any research that supports a decrease in funding for a program or practice that may be shown to be ineffective or harmful to those receiving services; and

Information concerning how the evidence referenced was used in the development of the budget request or budget amendment request.

If a state agency provides an evidence-based evaluation of a program or practice in a budget request or budget request amendment, joint budget committee staff shall independently analyze and describe the program or practice using the definitions set forth in this section.

Joint budget committee staff shall include any information specified in subsection (3) of this section as part of any recommendation it makes regarding a budget request or budget amendment request.

Whenever a state agency is required to undertake an evidence-based analysis of a program or practice, the state agency shall use the definitions set forth in this section, unless other definitions are provided by law.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-284), ch. 445, p. 2937, § 1, effective September 7.